02_Morphology/spa.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%>                   ! Morpheme Border
%<n%>                ! Name
%<pl%>               ! Plural
%<ito%>              ! Diminutive suffix -ito/-ita
%<illo%>             ! Diminutive suffix -illo/-ita
%{e%}                ! Archiphone for [e]
%{o%}                ! Archiphone for [o] v [a]
%{c%}                ! Archiphone for [c]

LEXICON Root

Nouns ;

LEXICON N

%<n%>: CASE ;

LEXICON CASE

%<nom%>: # ;
%<pl%>:%>%{e%}s # ;
%<ito%>:%>%{c%}it%{o%} # ;
%<illo%>:%>%{c%}ill%{o%} # ;

LEXICON Nouns

vez:vez N ; ! time (as in number of times)
año:año N ; ! year
tiempo:tiempo N ; ! time, weather
día:día N ; ! day
cosa:cosa N ; ! thing
hombre:hombre N ; ! man, mankind; husband
parte:parte N ; ! part, portion
vida:vida N ; ! life
momento:momento N ; ! moment, time
forma:forma N ; ! form, shape, way
casa:casa N ; ! house
mundo:mundo N ; ! world
mujer:mujer N ; ! woman, wife
caso:caso N ; ! case, occasion
país:país N ; ! country
lugar:lugar N ; ! place, position
persona:persona N ; ! person
hora:hora N ; ! hour, time
trabajo:trabajo N ; ! work, job, effort
punto:punto N ; ! point, dot, period
